Missouri, session 2026, SB1320.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 490.692, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 490.692,
to read as follows:
490.692. 1. Any records or copies of records
reproduced in the ordinary course of business by any
photographic, photostatic, microfilm, microcard, miniature
photographic, optical disk imaging, or other process which
accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium for so
reproducing the original that would be admissible under
sections 490.660 to 490.690 shall be admissible as a
business record, subject to other substantive or procedural
objections, in any court in this state upon the affidavit of
the person who would otherwise provide the prerequisites of
sections 490.660 to 490.690, that the records attached to
the affidavit were kept as required by section 490.680.
2. No party shall be permitted to offer such business
records into evidence pursuant to this section unless all
other parties to the action have been served with copies of
such records and such affidavit at least seven days prior to
the day upon which trial of the cause commences.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1320 2
3. The affidavit permitted by this section may be in
form and content substantially as follows:
THE STATE OF ______
COUNTY OF ______
AFFIDAVIT
Before me, the undersigned authority, personally appeared
______, who, being by me duly sworn, deposed as follows:
My name is ______, I am of sound mind, capable of making
this affidavit, and personally acquainted with the facts
herein stated:
I am the custodian of the records of ______. Attached
hereto are ______ pages of records from ______. These
______ pages of records are kept by ______ in the regular
course of business, and it was the regular course of

business of ______ for an employee or representative of

______ with knowledge of the act, event, condition,

opinion, or diagnosis recorded to make the record or to

transmit information thereof to be included in such

record; and the record was made at or near the time of

the act, event, condition, opinion or diagnosis. The

records attached hereto are the original or exact

duplicates of the original.

__________________
Affiant
[In witness whereof I have hereunto subscribed my name
and affixed my official seal this ______ day of ______,
20______.
__________________ __________________
(Signed) (Seal)]

SB 1320 3
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, an affidavit offered pursuant to this section
shall not be deemed invalid for the reason that it utilizes
an electronic signature or digital signature.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, an affidavit offered pursuant to this section
shall not be deemed invalid for the reason that it does not
include a notarization.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, an affidavit offered pursuant to this section
shall be signed in a manner that, if falsely made, would
subject the signer to criminal penalties pursuant to section
575.040.
✓